Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 860, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 145, O.S.L. 2023 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 860), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 3382 Page 1


Section 860. A. A project plan may contain a provision that


certain local taxes may be subject to incentives or may be exempted


in reinvestment areas, historic preservation areas, or enterprise


areas.


B. The governing body may grant incentives or exemptions from


local taxation only on a portion, not to exceed fifty percent (50%),


of the new investment made. No ad valorem tax incentives or


exemptions may be granted on the value of property which has been


assessed or which is subject to assessment prior to the adoption of


the project plan. No ad valorem tax incentives or exemptions


authorized in this section may be granted for retail establishments.


If a retail establishment is located in property which otherwise


qualifies for an incentive or exemption pursuant to this section,


the incentive or exemption shall not be allowed for that portion of


the property used for such retail establishment. As used in this


subsection, “retail establishment” shall not include an


establishment that provides lodging including, but not limited to, a


hotel, apartment hotel, public rooming house, or motel. No ad


valorem tax incentives or exemptions authorized in this section may


be granted if the property is located in an increment district or as


long as the property is subject to the ad valorem tax exemption for


new or expanding manufacturing facilities as authorized by Section


6B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. In the event of


disposition by lease or sublease to a lessee not entitled to an ad

Req. No. 3382 Page 2


valorem tax exemption, the improvements placed thereon shall not be


entitled to an ad valorem tax exemption provided for in Section 850


et seq. of this title. Except as otherwise provided by this


subsection, the incentives, or exemptions, which may be full or


partial, may be granted for a period not to exceed five (5) years.


With respect to an establishment, the business of which is described


by U.S. Industry Number 518210 of the North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual, 2017 revision, such incentives


or exemptions may be granted for a period not to exceed twenty-five


(25) years.


C. No incentives or exemptions may be granted to any business


or firm that is relocating from within the state and is subject to


or in the process of recruitment by two or more governmental


entities within the state unless the governmental entity in which


the business or firm does not locate adopts a resolution giving


their its approval to the granting of incentives or exemptions to


the business or firm locating in the competing governmental entity.


No incentives or exemptions may be granted to an out-of-state


business or firm that is subject to or in the process of recruitment


by two or more governmental entities within the state except as


otherwise provided for in this subsection. The prohibition against


incentives or exemptions to a business or firm relocating within the


state may be waived upon application by the governing body to, and


approval of, the Director Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 3382 Page 3


Department of Commerce. In order for the Director Chief Executive


Officer to approve the waiver, the Director Chief Executive Officer


must find that the incentives or exemptions are necessary and


sufficient to attract the business or firm and that the benefits


generated by the business location outweigh the costs of the


business location.


D. A project plan may contain a provision that ad valorem taxes


may be exempted in a commercial historic preservation area that is


adjacent to and serves designated historical residential areas for


neighborhood commercial preservation purposes in order for the


neighborhood to retain its basic character and scale. No ad valorem


tax exemption may be granted on the value of property which has been


assessed or which is subject to assessment prior to the adoption of


the project plan. No ad valorem tax exemption shall be granted


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection for single-family


residences. The governing body may grant the exemption only on the


increase in value of the property. The exemptions may be granted


for a specific period of time as determined by a written agreement


between the property owners of the area and the governing body and


may be renewed. Uses of the property eligible for this exemption


may include, but not be limited to, commercial, office, or


multifamily residential use.


E. For increment districts in operation for nine (9) months or


more, on or before the ninetieth day following the end of each

Req. No. 3382 Page 4


fiscal year, the governing body of a city, town, or county shall


submit a report to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The


Department shall provide a copy of the report to any member of the


public upon request. The disclosure report shall include the


following information:


1. The amount and source of revenue captured and apportioned


pursuant to the project plan;


2. The amount and purpose of expenditures;


3. The amount of principal and interest due on outstanding


bonded indebtedness;


4. The tax increment base and current captured appraised value


or the other local tax or fee collections retained by the area;


5. The captured appraised value or the other local tax or fee


collections shared by the city, town, or county and other taxing


entities, the total amount of tax increments received, and any


additional information necessary to demonstrate compliance with the


plan adopted by the city, town, or county;


6. The name of the person who is currently in charge of the


implementation of the plan; and


7. The names of the persons who have disclosed an interest as


required pursuant to Section 857 of this title and the interest


disclosed.


F. For those incentive districts in operation for nine (9)


months or more, on or before the ninetieth day following the end of

Req. No. 3382 Page 5


each fiscal year, the governing body of a city, town, or county


shall submit a report to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The


Department shall provide a copy of the report to any member of the


public upon request. The disclosure report shall include the


following information:


1. The parties receiving incentives or exemptions;


2. A general description of the property and the improvements


to be made;


3. The portion and fair market value of the property to be


exempted or that portion of the local taxes to be subject to


incentives or to be exempted;


4. The duration of the incentives or exemptions;


5. Any additional information necessary to demonstrate


compliance with the tax incentives or exemptions;


6. The name of the person who is currently in charge of the


implementation of the plan; and


7. The names of the persons who have disclosed an interest as


required pursuant to Section 857 of this title and the interest


disclosed.


G. Any project plan created pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall include provisions or investments that serve the whole


public within the jurisdiction of the applicable governing body. A


project plan shall not be adopted that exclusively provides


incentives or exemptions to private entities.

Req. No. 3382 Page 6


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 861, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 861. A. A project plan may contain a provision that


the increments from certain local taxes or fees may be used to


finance project costs in areas qualified under the Local Development


Act. The increment from local taxes or fees levied from and after


the effective date of the approval of such plan shall be apportioned


in the following manner for a period not to exceed twenty-five (25)


fiscal years thereafter or the period required for payment of


project costs, whichever is less; provided, however, that for any


increment district established after November 1, 1992, such time


period shall be tolled for a period of time equal to the pendency of


any litigation directly or indirectly challenging the increment


district or apportionment or disbursement:


1. That portion of the ad valorem taxes which are produced by


the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such ad valorem


taxing entity upon the base assessed value of the increment district


determined pursuant to Section 862 of this title and as to an area


later added to the increment district, the effective date of the


addition to the increment district, shall be paid to each taxing


entity and all or any portion of local sales taxes, other local


taxes or local fees collected each year which are not subject to


apportionment shall be paid or retained as otherwise provided by


law; and

Req. No. 3382 Page 7


2. All or any A portion not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of:


a. ad valorem taxes, in excess of such amount specified


in paragraph 1 of this subsection,


b. the increment of local sales taxes, other local taxes


or local fees, or a combination thereof, paid to or


for the benefit of the city, town, or county approving


the plan, and


c. with its consent, evidenced by agreement in writing,


the increment of local sales tax, other local taxes or


local fees, or combination thereof, payable to any


other local public taxing entity,


shall be apportioned to, and when collected, shall be paid into an


apportionment fund established for the project pursuant to the


project plan. Such revenues shall be used for the payment of the


project costs and for the payment of the principal of, the interest


on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans,


notes, or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred to finance


project costs, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, for


financing, in whole or in part, eligible project costs. For the


purposes of this section, “local sales tax” means amounts payable to


or for the benefit of a local governmental entity calculated as a


percentage of gross sales whether imposed by ordinance, resolution,


covenant, or agreement. Nothing shall prohibit the increments from


being used to directly pay eligible project costs. When all

Req. No. 3382 Page 8


eligible project costs and such bonds, loans, advances of money, or


indebtedness, if any, including interest thereon and any premiums


due in connection with them, have been paid and the governing body


adopts an ordinance or resolution dissolving the tax apportionment


financing, all ad valorem taxes upon the taxable property within the


boundary of such district shall be paid into the funds of the


respective taxing entities.


B. If a project plan contains a provision for apportionment as


provided in subsection A of this section, and notwithstanding any


other provision of law to the contrary, the governing body shall


direct in the resolution or ordinance approving the plan which


portion of the increments, including whether if any or all, to be


paid into the apportionment fund shall constitute a part of the


general fund to be appropriated annually by the governing body, and


which portion, including whether if any or all, shall constitute


funds of a public entity authorized to issue tax apportionment bonds


or notes or to incur project costs.


C. To the extent that collections exceed project costs and the


provisions for payment of principal and interest along with


sufficient reserves on any bonds issued pursuant to the provisions


of Section 863 of this title, the excess shall be paid into the


funds of the respective taxing entities unless the taxing entity


agrees to some other use of such collections.



Req. No. 3382 Page 9


D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, for any


year in which taxes or fees are apportioned in the manner specified


in paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section, any increase in


assessed valuation of taxable real property or taxable personal


property within the boundaries of such district in excess of the


base assessed value shall not be considered by any taxing entity in


computing any debt limitation or for any other purpose except for


the levy of taxes and in determining the amount to be apportioned.


E. In the event there is a change in the assessment ratio for


ad valorem tax property valuations of property within the boundaries


of an increment district, the portions of valuations for assessment


pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection A of this section shall


be proportionately adjusted in accordance with such reassessment.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving


property in such project area from being assessed as provided in the


Ad Valorem Tax Code of the Oklahoma Statutes, or as relieving owners


of such property from paying a uniform rate of taxes, as required by


Section 5 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


G. Subject to constitutional exemptions, if property in an


increment district is owned by a public entity and is leased to or


operated for a private use, including, without limitation, use by a


not-for-profit corporation or trust, the portion of the property so


leased or operated shall be assessed by the county assessor as if


such portion of the property were taxable, and, during the term of

Req. No. 3382 Page 10


the increment district, the public entity owning such property shall


pay or require the user thereof to pay ad valorem taxes or an in


lieu ad valorem tax payment in an amount not less than the amount


that would have resulted if taxes had otherwise been levied on such


portion of the property. If property subject to ad valorem tax in


an increment district is acquired by a private not-for-profit


corporation or public or private trust, it shall continue to be


assessed and subject to ad valorem taxes or an in lieu ad valorem


payment by the user thereof until termination of the increment


district unless and only to the extent of the portion of the


property and the use thereof that is:


1. Acquired to implement the project plan;


2. Converted to a new tax-exempt use by a tax-exempt user; or


3. Entitled to claim a constitutional exemption notwithstanding


statutory provisions.


During the period of an increment district, such nonexempt uses and


interests are severable for purposes of ad valorem and in lieu of ad


valorem assessment and payments, notwithstanding any statutory


provisions to the contrary.


H. Any project plan created pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall include project costs that serve the whole public


within the jurisdiction of the applicable governing body. A project


plan shall not be adopted that exclusively apportions increments to


the project costs of private entities.

Req. No. 3382 Page 11


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3382 QD 1/15/2026 9:56:04 AM











































Req. No. 3382 Page 12